Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1301.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 44, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding chapter 30, to read: CHAPTER 30 BUSINESS RELOCATION ARTICLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS START_STATUTE44-7301. Definitions In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Agency" means a department or agency of the executive branch of state government. 2. "Employer": (a) means a business entity that employs either of the following: (i) Fifty or more employees, excluding part-time employees. (ii) Fifty or more employees who in the aggregate work at least one THOUSAND FIVE hundred hours per week, not including overtime hours. (b) Includes any business entity that employs fifty or more employees, excluding part-time employees, and that received a state subsidy to relocate, expand or start a business. 3. "Part-time employee" means an employee who is employed for an average of fewer than twenty hours per week or who has been employed for fewer than six of the twelve months preceding the date on which notice is required under section 44-7302. 4. "State subsidy" means any of the following: (a) a Tax incentive. (b) a Grant. (c) a Guaranteed loan. (d) a Tax benefit. (e) any Other governmental support.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE44-7302. Business entity relocation; notification; civil penalty A. An employer that intends to relocate from this state to another state or to a foreign country shall notify the director of the department of economic security of that intention at least one hundred twenty days before the relocation. B. An employer that violates this section is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 for each day of the violation, except that the director of the industrial commission of Arizona may reduce the amount for just cause. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE44-7303. Semiannual employer list; distribution A. The director of the department of economic security shall compile a semiannual list of all employers that relocate from this state to another state or to a foreign country.  The list shall include the name of the employer and the date on which the employer relocated. B. The director of the department of economic security shall distribute the list required by this section to all agencies. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE44-7304. Ineligibility for state subsidy; remittance of monies; exceptions A. Except as provided in subsection B of this section and notwithstanding any other law, an employer that appears on the list prescribed by section 44-7303: 1. Is not eligible for any direct or indirect state subsidy for five years after the date that the list is published. 2. Shall remit to this state the unamortized value of any state subsidy the employer has previously received. 3. Shall pay to this state all state subsidies that the employer has received. B. The Arizona commerce authority, in consultation with the appropriate agency providing a state subsidy, may waive the ineligibility or remittance requirement prescribed in subsection A of this section if the employer applying for the state subsidy demonstrates that a lack of the state subsidy would do any of the following: 1. Result in substantial job losses in this state. 2. Harm the environment. 3. Result in a significant economic impact to this state.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE44-7305. State business location requirement; contractor requirements A. The director of each agency shall ensure that all work performed by an employer that relates to state business is conducted entirely within this state or by a state contractor or a state contractor's agent or subcontractor. B. A state contractor that performs work related to state business may not hire an individual to perform that work at a location outside of this state. C. a State contractor that currently performs work outside of this state shall comply with this section on or before November 1, 2027 except that beginning November 1, 2026 all new employees hired by a state contractor to perform work on a contract shall immediately be employed within this state. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE44-7306. State benefits for workers This chapter does not allow the withholding or denial of payments, compensation or benefits under any other law to workers who are employed by employers that relocate to another state or to a foreign country.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Effective date This act is effective from and after October 31, 2026. Sec. 3. Short title This act may be cited as the "State Investment Accountability Act".